Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Hunting Incidents in Which Use of Weapon Causes Injury or Death to a Person

§ 49-7-301.
Implied consent to chemical test of certain bodily substances for presence of alcohol or other drugs; validity of chemical analysis; who may take bodily substance specimens.

Any person who exercises the privilege of hunting in this state shall be deemed to have given implied consent to a chemical test of his blood, breath, urine or other bodily substance for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or any other drug if the person is involved in a hunting incident in which his use of a weapon caused an injury or death to a person.

For the chemical analysis of the person’s blood, breath, urine or other bodily substance to be considered valid under this section, the analysis must have been performed according to the requirements established in Section 63-11-19.

When a person undergoes a chemical test at the request of a law enforcement officer, only a physician, registered nurse, laboratory technician, emergency medical technician, or other qualified person may draw blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol or drug content therein. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath or urine specimens. No physician, registered nurse, laboratory technician, emergency medical technician or other qualified person shall incur any civil liability as a result of the medically proper taking of the blood specimens when requested by a law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 553, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 49-7-303.
Revocation or suspension of hunting license where use of weapon by person with specified alcohol concentration causes serious injury or death to another person; admissibility of chemical test results in civil or criminal actions; hunter education course required for restoration of hunting privileges.

A person involved in a hunting incident in which his use of a weapon caused a serious bodily injury or death to another person and who has an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths percent (.08%) or more based on specified levels in Section 63-11-30, or is under the influence of any drug or controlled substance, shall have his hunting privileges revoked or suspended for two (2) years, in addition to any other punishment imposed. The chemical test must have been administered within three (3) hours after the hunting incident.

If a person refuses to submit to the test at the request of a law enforcement officer, then none shall be given. The hunting privileges of a person who refuses the test shall be suspended for four (4) years. The law enforcement officer shall inform the person that his refusal to submit to a test is admissible in court and that his hunting privileges will be revoked or suspended for four (4) years.

The results of such tests and the refusal to submit to a test shall be admissible in any civil or criminal action arising out of the hunting incident in which the person was involved.

Any person whose hunting privileges are revoked or suspended under this section shall be required to complete an approved hunter education course before hunting privileges may be restored.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 553, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 49-7-305.
Hunting incident reports.

Hunting incident reports shall be exempt from disclosure or dissemination under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 in accordance with the provisions of Section 45-29-1.

Upon written request of any person involved in the hunting incident, the representative of his estate, the surviving spouse or surviving next of kin, the commission may disclose to the requesting party or the requestor’s legal counsel or insurance representative any information contained in the report.

The commission shall charge a minimum reproduction fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) plus any other costs associated with the request for the report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 553, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2006.